apertium-en-gl/apertium-en-gl.en.metadix
    <pardef n="chid/e__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>es</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>den</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cho/ose__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ose</l> 
        <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ose</l> 
        <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oses</l> 
        <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>se</l> 
        <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sen</l> 
        <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>osing</l> 
        <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>osing</l> 
        <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>osing</l> 
        <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cl/ing__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ings</l> 
        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ung</l> 
        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ung</l> 
        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inging</l> 
        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inging</l> 
        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inging</l> 
        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cl/othe__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>othe</l> 
        <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>othe</l> 
        <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>othes</l> 
        <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ad</l> 
        <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ad</l> 
        <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>othing</l> 
        <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>othing</l> 
        <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>othing</l> 
        <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="control__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>led</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>led</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ling</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ling</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ling</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ke/ep__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ep</l> 
        <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ep</l> 
        <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eps</l> 
        <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>pt</l> 
        <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>pt</l> 
        <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eping</l> 
        <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eping</l> 
        <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eping</l> 
        <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="deal__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>t</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>t</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/ie__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ie</l> 
        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ie</l> 
        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ies</l> 
        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ied</l> 
        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ied</l> 
        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ying</l> 
        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ying</l> 
        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ying</l> 
        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

<e r="LR" lm="burn">
        <i>burn</i> 
        <par n="deal__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="cancel">
        <i>cancel</i> 
        <par n="control__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="choose">
        <i>cho</i> 
        <par n="cho/ose__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="control">
        <i>control</i> 
        <par n="control__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="counsel">
        <i>counsel</i> 
        <par n="control__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="die">
        <i>d</i> 
        <par n="d/ie__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="die a natural death">
	    <i>d</i> 
        <par n="d/ie__vblex"/> 
	    <p>
		    <l><b/>a<b/>natural<b/>death</l> 
		    <r><g><b/>a<b/>natural<b/>death</g></r> 
	    </p>
    </e>
<e lm="die away">
	    <i>d</i> 
	    <par n="d/ie__vblex"/> 
	    <p>
		    <l><b/>away</l> 
		    <r><g><b/>away</g></r> 
	    </p>
    </e>
<e lm="die down">
	    <i>d</i> 
	    <par n="d/ie__vblex"/> 
	    <p>
		    <l><b/>down</l> 
		    <r><g><b/>down</g></r> 
	    </p>
    </e>
<e lm="die out">
	    <i>d</i> 
	    <par n="d/ie__vblex"/> 
	    <p>
		    <l><b/>out</l> 
		    <r><g><b/>out</g></r> 
	    </p>
    </e>
<e lm="die off">
	    <i>d</i> 
	    <par n="d/ie__vblex"/> 
	    <p>
		    <l><b/>off</l> 
		    <r><g><b/>off</g></r> 
	    </p>
    </e>
<e lm="deal">
        <i>deal</i> 
        <par n="deal__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="deal with">
        <i>deal</i> 
        <par n="deal__vblex"/> 
      <p>
        <l><b/>with</l> 
        <r><g><b/>with</g></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e lm="dispel">
        <i>dispel</i> 
        <par n="control__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e r="LR" lm="dream">
        <i>dream</i> 
        <par n="deal__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="enrol">
        <i>enrol</i> 
        <par n="control__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="enroll" c="American English">
        <i>enroll</i> 
        <par n="control__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="expel">
        <i>expel</i> 
        <par n="control__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="fulfil">
        <i>fulfil</i> 
        <par n="control__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="keep in touch">
	    <i>ke</i> 
	    <par n="ke/ep__vblex"/> 
	    <p>
		    <l><b/>in<b/>touch</l> 
		    <r><g><b/>in<b/>touch</g></r> 
	    </p>
    </e>
<e lm="keep in touch with">
	    <i>ke</i> 
	    <par n="ke/ep__vblex" sa="sep"/> 
	    <p>
		    <l><b/>in<b/>touch<b/>with</l> 
		    <r><g><b/>in<b/>touch<b/>with</g></r> 
	    </p>
	    <par n="prsubj__prn"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="keep on">
        <i>ke</i> 
        <par n="ke/ep__vblex"/> 
      <p>
        <l><b/>on</l> 
        <r><g><b/>on</g></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e lm="keep">
        <i>ke</i> 
        <par n="ke/ep__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="label">
        <i>label</i> 
        <par n="control__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e r="LR" lm="lean">
        <i>lean</i> 
        <par n="deal__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e r="LR" lm="leap">
        <i>leap</i> 
        <par n="deal__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="learn">
        <i>learn</i> 
        <par n="deal__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="mean">
        <i>mean</i> 
        <par n="deal__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="repel">
        <i>repel</i> 
        <par n="control__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="signal">
        <i>signal</i> 
        <par n="control__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="sleep">
        <i>sle</i> 
        <par n="ke/ep__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="snivel">
	    <i>snivel</i> 
	    <par n="control__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="swing">
        <i>sw</i> 
        <par n="cl/ing__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="sweep">
        <i>swe</i> 
        <par n="ke/ep__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="tie">
        <i>t</i> 
        <par n="d/ie__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="travel">
        <i>travel</i> 
        <par n="control__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="travel across">
        <i>travel</i> 
        <par n="control__vblex"/> 
      <p>
        <l><b/>across</l> 
        <r><g><b/>across</g></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e lm="weep">
        <i>we</i> 
        <par n="ke/ep__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="compel"><i>compel</i><par n="control__vblex"/>    </e>
